Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-18] Fees; public hearing. (a) An
institution applying for authorization shall pay $10,000 to the department upon application for
authorization under this chapter and every two years thereafter upon
application for reauthorization.

(b) The director may assess fees as provided in this chapter and,
notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, may change the
amount of the fees required by this section at any time without regard to
chapter 91, if the director:

(1) Holds at least one public hearing to discuss and
take testimony on the proposed fee change; and

(2) Provides public notice at least thirty days prior
to the date of the public hearing.

(c) Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into
the post-secondary education authorization subaccount established pursuant to
section 26-9(o). [L 2013, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next